src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! # Pronouns for Inari Saami
!     ========

! Pointing to all the pronominal subgroups

LEXICON Pronoun !!≈ * **@CODE@**
Personal ;
Demonstrative ;
Reflexive ;
Reciprocal ;
Interrogative ;
! Relative ;
Indefinite ;


!! ## Personal pronouns
! -----------------

LEXICON Personal !!≈ * **@CODE@**
mun+Pron+Pers+Sg1:mu perspronsg ;
tun+Pron+Pers+Sg2:tu perspronsg ;
sun+Pron+Pers+Sg3:su perspronsg ;
mun+Pron+Pers+Du1:mu persprondu ;
tun+Pron+Pers+Du2:tu persprondu ;
sun+Pron+Pers+Du3:su persprondu ;
mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1:mi perspronpl ;
tun+Pron+Pers+Pl2:ti perspronpl ;
sun+Pron+Pers+Pl3:si perspronpl ;


LEXICON perspronsg !!≈ * **@CODE@** with contlex K and not G (munge)
+Nom:n	K ;
+Gen:u	      K ;
+Acc:u	      K ;
+Ill:njin	      K ;
+Loc:st	          K ;
+Loc+Use/NG:ste	      K ;
+Com:in	          K ;
+Com+Use/NG:uin	      K ;
+Abe:uttáá	      K ;
+Ess:nen	      K ;
+Par:đe	      K ;

LEXICON persprondu !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Nom:oi	K ;
+Nom+Use/NG:ái	K ;
+Gen:nnuu	      K ;
+Acc:nnuu	      K ;
+Ill:nnui	      K ;
+Ill+Err/Orth:nnuid	      K ;
+Loc:nnust	      K ;
+Com:nnuin	      K ;
+Com+Use/NG:nnuuin	      K ; !^NG^
+Abe:nnuuttáá      K ;
+Ess:nnun	      K ;
+Par:nnud	      K ;

LEXICON perspronpl !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Nom:j	K ;
+Gen:i	      K ;
+Acc:i	      K ;
+Ill:jjân	      K ;
+Loc:st	      K ;
+Loc+Use/NG:ste	      K ;
+Com:iguin	      K ;
+Com+Use/NG:igijn	      K ;
+Abe:ittáá	      K ;
+Ess:nen	      K ;
+Par:đe	      K ;



!! Demonstrative pronouns
! ----------------------

LEXICON Demonstrative !!≈ * **@CODE@**
tot+Pron+Dem:t	TOT ;
tiedot+Pron+Dem:tied	TOT ;
tuot+Pron+Dem:	TUOT ;
tiet+Pron+Dem:	TIET ;
taat+Pron+Dem: TAAT ;
táát+Pron+Dem: TAEAET ;
tieggáár+Pron+Dem:tieggáár TAGGAAR ;
tyeggáár+Pron+Dem:tyeggáár TAGGAAR ;
tuoggáár+Pron+Dem:tuoggáár TAGGAAR ;
tuággáár+Pron+Dem:tuággáár TAGGAAR ;
taggaar+Pron+Dem:taggaar TAGGAAR "semmoinen" ;
tággáár+Pron+Dem:tággáár TAGGAAR ;


LEXICON TIET !!≈ * **@CODE@**
:tie TI-TUO ;  
:tie TA ;
+Sg+Ill:ties	K ;
+Sg+Com:tiein	K ;

LEXICON TOT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
:o	TI-TUO ;
:a	TA ;
+Sg+Com+Use/NG:ooin	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NG:ooid	K ;
+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:os K ; ! XXX check
+Sg+Ill:oos	K ;
!+Pl+Ill:ooid K ;

LEXICON TUOT !!≈ * **@CODE@**
:tuo	TI-TUO ;
:tye	TYE ;
+Sg+Ill:tuos	K ;
+Sg+Com+Use/NG:tuooin	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NG:tuooid	K ;


LEXICON TI-TUO !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Sg+Nom:t	K ;
+Sg+Gen:n	K ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:n	K ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:n	K ;
+Sg+Acc:m	K ;
+Sg+Com:in K ;
+Sg+Abe:nttáá	K ;
+Pl+Nom:h	K ;
+Pl+Gen:i5	K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:i5	K ;
+Pl+Ill:id	K ; ! tot > toid, tiet > tieid
+Pl+Com:iguin	K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:igijn	K ;
+Pl+Abe:ittáá	K ;

LEXICON TA !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Sg+Loc:st	K ;
+Ess:nen	K ;
+Par:đe	K ;
+Pl+Acc:id	K ; ! tot > taid, tiet > tieid
+Pl+Loc:in	K ;

LEXICON TYE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Sg+Loc:st	K ;
+Sg+Ess:nen	K ;
+Sg+Par:đe	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:id	K ;
+Pl+Loc:in	K ;


LEXICON TAAT
+Sg+Nom:taat	K ;
+Sg+Gen:taan	K ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:taan	K ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:taan	K ;
+Sg+Acc:taam	K ;
!+Sg+Acc:taan	K ;
+Sg+Ill:taas K ;
+Sg+Loc:täst K ;
+Sg+Com:tain	K ;
+Sg+Abe:taanttáá	K ;
+Ess:tänen K ;
+Par:täđe K ;
+Pl+Nom:taah	K ;
+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:tah	K ;
+Pl+Gen:tai	K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:tai	K ;
+Pl+Acc:täid K ;
+Pl+Ill:taid	K ;
+Pl+Loc:täin K ;
+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:táin K ;
+Pl+Com:taiguin	K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:taigijn	K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:tai	K ;
+Pl+Abe:taittáá	K ;



LEXICON TAEAET
+Sg+Nom:táát	K ;
+Sg+Gen:táán	K ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:táán	K ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:táán	K ;
+Sg+Acc:táám	K ;
!+Sg+Acc:táán	K ;
+Sg+Ill:táás K ;
+Sg+Loc:täst K ;
+Sg+Com:táin	K ;
+Sg+Abe:táánttáá	K ;
+Ess:tänen K ;
+Par:täđe K ;
+Pl+Nom:tááh	K ;
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:täi	K ; ! From missing list
+Pl+Gen:táái	K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:tái	K ;
+Pl+Acc:täid K ;
+Pl+Ill:tááid	K ;
+Pl+Ill+Use/NG:táid	K ;
+Pl+Loc:täin K ;
+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:táin K ;
+Pl+Com:táiguin	K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:táigijn	K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:tái	K ;
+Pl+Abe:táittáá	K ;



!! ## Reflexive pronouns
! ------------------

LEXICON Interrogative != * __@CODE@__

mii+Pron+Interr: miiInterRel ;
kii+Pron+Interr: kiiInterRel ;
mii+Pron+Rel: miiInterRel ;
kii+Pron+Rel: kiiInterRel ;

kote+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom:kote K ;
kote+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc:kođe K ;
kote+Pron+Interr+Sg+Loc:koođeest K ;
kote+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com:kuuđijn K ;

kote+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom:kote K ;
kote+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc:kođe K ;
kote+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc:koođeest K ;
kote+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com:kuuđijn K ;

kotemuš+Pron+Interr:kote KOTEMUS "kumpi" ; !kotemui
kotemuš+Pron+Rel:kote KOTEMUS "kumpi" ; !kotemui


maggaar+Pron+Interr:maggaar TAGGAAR "millainen" ; !maggaargin maggaarnii
maggaar+Pron+Indef:maggaar TAGGAAR "millainen" ; !maggaargin maggaarnii


LEXICON miiInterRel !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Sg+Acc:maid    K ; ! The exceptions
+Sg+Acc+Known:mon     K ;
+Ess:manen	K ;
+Par:mađe	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:moid    K ; ! 
+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:mooi    K ;
 :m	MK ;
 :moo	MK-long ;
 :mo	MK-short ;
 :ma	MK-low ;


LEXICON kiiInterRel !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Sg+Acc:kiäm    K ;
+Sg+Loc+Use/NG:kest    K ; 
+Ess:kenen	K ;
+Par:keđe	K ;
+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:keid	K ;
+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:kein    K ; 
:k	MK ; ! sg nom
:kiä	MK-long ; ! ill, plcom, plabe
:kiä	MK-short ; ! sggen, sggen, sgabe, plnom...
:kiä	MK-low ;



LEXICON MK !!≈ * **@CODE@** common for mii and kii
+Sg+Nom:ii	K ;

LEXICON MK-long !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Sg+Ill:s	K ;
+Pl+Ill:id K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:iguin	K ;
+Pl+Abe+Use/NG:ittáá K ;

LEXICON MK-short !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Sg+Gen:n	K ;
+Sg+Com:in	K ;
+Sg+Abe:nttáá	K ;
+Pl+Nom:h	K ;
+Pl+Gen:i	K ;
+Pl+Com:iguin	K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:igijn	K ;
+Pl+Abe:ittáá	K ;

LEXICON MK-low !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Sg+Loc:st	K ;
+Pl+Acc:id	K ;
+Pl+Loc:in	K ;




!! ## Indefinite pronouns
! ----------------------

 LEXICON JUAHAS
 +Sg+Nom:š^CSH^RLEN K ;      ! kááhuš ka^RVhhu^CSH^RLEN%>š 
 +Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN K ;        ! kahhuu 
 +Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN K ;        ! kahhuu 
 +Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st K ;    ! kahhuust 
 +Sg+Com:%>in K ;            ! kahhuin 
 +Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá K ;  ! kahhuuttáá 
 +Ess:^SVž^SLEN%>in K ;      ! kahhuužin 
 +Ess+Err/Orth:ž^CSH%>in K ; ! káhužin 
 +Par:^SVž^SLEN%>id K ;      ! kahhuužid 
 +Par+Err/Orth:ž^CSH%>id K ; ! káhužid 

LEXICON JIESKOTE
!+Attr+Foc/uv:jieškote-uv # ; ! Attr only for deviant Ill, Loc
+Sg+Nom+Foc/uv:jieškote-uv # ;
+Sg+Gen+Foc/uv:jieškođe-uv # ;
+Sg+Acc+Foc/uv:jieškođe-uv # ;
+Sg+Ill+Foc/uv:jieškootán-uv # ;
+Sg+Loc+Foc/uv:jieškoođeest-uv # ;
+Sg+Com+Foc/uv:jieškuuđijn-uv # ;

+Sg+Ill+Attr+Foc/uv:jieškođe-uv # ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr+Foc/uv:jieškođe-uv # ;

+Pl+Nom+Foc/uv:jieškođeh-uv # ;
+Pl+Gen+Foc/uv:jieškuuđij-uv # ;
+Pl+Acc+Foc/uv:jieškuuđijd-uv # ;
+Pl+Ill+Foc/uv:jieškuuđijd-uv # ;
+Pl+Loc+Foc/uv:jieškuuđijn-uv # ;
+Pl+Com+Foc/uv:jieškuuđijguin-uv # ;

+Sg+Nom+Err/Lex:jieškoteuv # ;

LEXICON KIINII
+Sg+Nom:kiinii	K ;
+Sg+Gen:kiännii	K ;
+Sg+Acc:kiännii	K ;
+Sg+Ill:kiäsnii K ;
+Sg+Loc:kiästnii K ;
+Sg+Com:kiäinnii	K ;
+Sg+Abe:kiänttáá	K ;
+Pl+Nom:kiähnii	K ;
+Pl+Gen:kiäinnii	K ;
+Pl+Acc:kiäidnii K ;
+Pl+Ill:kiäidnii	K ;
+Pl+Loc:kiäinnii K ;
+Pl+Com:kiäiguin	K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:kiäigijn	K ;
+Pl+Abe:kiäinttáá	K ;

! Kiinii almaid čuážui uuvsâ tyehin.

LEXICON MIINII
+Sg+Nom:miinii	K ;
+Sg+Gen:monnii	K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:naidnii	K ;
+Sg+Acc:maidnii	K ;
+Sg+Ill:moosnii K ;
+Sg+Loc:mastnii  K ;

LEXICON Indefinite
kii+Pron+Indef: kiiInterRel ; !veikkâ kiäs
mii+Pron+Indef: miiInterRel ;
juáháš+Pron+Indef:juáhhá JUAHAS "jokainen" ; ! JUAHAS! (not KUABAS)
kiinii+Pron+Indef: KIINII ;
miinii+Pron+Indef: MIINII ;
jieškote+Pron+Indef: JIESKOTE ;
